Washington statutes.
RCW 6.13.020

Homestead—What may constitute.

If the owner is married or in a state registered domestic partnership, the homestead may consist of the community or jointly owned property of the spouses or the domestic partners or the separate property of either spouse or either domestic partner: PROVIDED, That the same premises may not be claimed separately by the spouses or domestic partners with the effect of increasing the net value of the homestead available to the marital community or state registered domestic partnership beyond the amount specified in RCW 6.13.030 as now or hereafter amended. When the owner is not married or not in a state registered domestic partnership, the homestead may consist of any of his or her property.

[ 2008 c 6 s 633; 1987 c 442 s 202; 1981 c 329 s 8; 1977 ex.s. c 98 s 1; 1973 1st ex.s. c 154 s 6; 1895 c 64 s 2; RRS s 530. Formerly RCW 6.12.020.]

NOTES:

Part headings not law—Severability—2008 c 6: See RCW 26.60.900 and 26.60.901.

Severability—1981 c 329: See note following RCW 6.21.020.

Severability—1973 1st ex.s. c 154: See note following RCW 2.12.030.